Illinois, session 104th, SB302.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Older Adult Services Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (320 ILCS 42/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Older 8Adult Services Act.9(Source: P.A. 93-1031, eff. 8-27-04.)